Hawaii statutes.
§663-6 Death of wrongdoer or other person
liable prior to suit, time for commencing action against the estate. In
any case where the wrongdoer or other person who may be liable for damages for
physical injury or death as provided in section 663-3 dies before an action has
been brought against the wrongdoer or other person, the action may be brought
against the legal representative of the wrongdoer's or other person's estate;
provided that every such action shall be commenced within two years after the death
of the injured person in any action brought under section 663-3 or within two
years after the date of physical injury in all other cases, except as otherwise
provided. [L 1953, c 206, pt of §1; am L 1955, c 205, pt of §3; RL 1955,
§246-5; am L 1967, c 108, §1; HRS §663-6; am L 1972, c 144, §2(e); gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Abatement and revival, see chapter 634, pt V.

Probate, claims, see chapter 560.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next